Hawaii statutes.
§576B-306 Inappropriate tribunal. If a
petition or comparable pleading is received by an inappropriate tribunal of
this State, that tribunal shall forward the pleading and accompanying documents
to an appropriate tribunal of this State or another state and notify the
petitioner where and when the pleading was sent. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L
2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next